District of Columbia statutes.
50-1931

Pedestrian Advisory Council.

(a)

There is established a Pedestrian Advisory Council (“PAC”).

(b)

The PAC shall be composed of 18 members appointed as follows:

(1)

The Director of the District Department of Transportation, or designee;

(2)

The Chief of the Metropolitan Police Department, or designee;

(3)

The Director of the Office of Planning, or designee;

(4)

The Director of the Department of Parks and Recreation, or designee;

(5)

The Chancellor of the District of Columbia Public Schools, or designee; and

(6)

Thirteen community representatives who are District of Columbia residents with a demonstrated interest in pedestrian safety, with each member of the Council of the District of Columbia appointing one representative.

(c)

A chairperson shall be elected from among the 13 community representatives at the first meeting of the PAC, who shall serve for a term of 2 years.

(d)

(1)

The community members shall be appointed for a term of 3 years, with initial staggered appointments of 4 members appointed for one year, 5 members appointed for 2 years, and 4 members appointed for 3 years. The members to serve the one-year term, the members to serve the 2-year term, and the members to serve the 3-year term shall be determined by lot at the first meeting of the PAC.

(2)

Vacancies shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointment to the position that became vacant. Community members who are appointed to fill vacancies that occur before the expiration of a community member’s full term shall serve only the unexpired portion of the community member’s term.

(e)

The District Department of Transportation shall provide the PAC with an annual operating budget, which shall include funds to maintain a website where the PAC shall provide a public listing of members, meeting notices, and meeting minutes.

(f)

The purpose of the PAC shall be to serve as the advisory body to the Mayor, the Council of the District of Columbia, and the District agencies on matters pertaining to the improvement of pedestrian safety and accessibility.

History

Mar. 3, 2010, D.C. Law 18-111, § 6061, 57 DCR 181
Oct. 22, 2015, D.C. Law 21-36, § 6073, 62 DCR 10905

Cross References

Commissioner of Insurance and Securities, powers and duties, see § 31-103.
Compulsory/no-fault motor vehicle insurance, availability and coverage, see § 31-2401 et seq.
Motor vehicle safety, administration and enforcement, see § 50-1301.03.
Regulation of traffic, power to promulgate regulations, see § 50-2201.03.

Effect of Amendments

The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 21-36 designated the existing text of (d) as (d)(1); and added (d)(2).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 6061 of Fiscal Year 2010 Budget Support Second Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-207, October 15, 2009, 56 DCR 8234).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 6061 of Fiscal Year Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-260, January 4, 2010, 57 DCR 345).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 6073 of the Fiscal Year 2016 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-127, July 27, 2015, 62 DCR 10201).

Short Title

Short title: Section 6060 of D.C. Law 18-111 provided that subtitle G of title VI of the act may be cited as the “Pedestrian Advisory Council Establishment Act of 2009”.